California, session 20252026, AB1370.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Nondisclosure agreements serve an important role, especially in litigation involving two or more private parties. However, their use during negotiations for proposed legislation in the State of California prevents Members of the Legislature from providing adequate transparency when conducting the people’s business.(b) Nondisclosure agreements are appropriate to use when attempting to protect trade secrets or the financial or proprietary information of a private party. However, this information is rarely required for discussions regarding proposed legislation.(c) Existing law prohibits including certain provisions within settlement agreements or agreements related to an employee’s separation from employment that prevent the disclosure of information related to workplace misconduct, sexual harassment, or sexual assault, and thus the conduct of perpetrators in these instances is not shielded from disclosure.SEC. 2. Section 8923 is added to the Government Code, to read:8923. (a) Except as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), a Member of the Legislature acting in their official capacity shall not enter into, or request that another individual enter into, a nondisclosure agreement relating to the drafting, negotiation, or discussion of proposed legislation.(b) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), any nondisclosure agreement relating to the drafting, negotiation, or discussion of proposed legislation entered into or requested by a Member of the Legislature after the effective date of this section shall be void and unenforceable.(c) (1) This section does not prohibit a Member of the Legislature from entering into or requesting a nondisclosure agreement that prevents only the disclosure of trade secrets, financial information, or proprietary information.(2) This section does not make void and unenforceable a nondisclosure agreement, or portion of a nondisclosure agreement, that prevents only the disclosure of trade secrets, financial information, or proprietary information.(3) Notwithstanding Section 8924, this section applies only to a Member of the Legislature acting in their official capacity.(d) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “Discussion” means direct or indirect communications engaged in by individuals for the purpose of reaching a decision regarding proposed legislation.(2) “Drafting” means developing language for proposed legislation to be considered by the Legislature.(3) “Negotiation” means any form of direct or indirect communication whereby individuals who have opposing interests discuss the form of any proposed legislation that may resolve a dispute involving those interests.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.